Alaska statutes. Title 37. Public Finance.
Article 8. Alaska Veterans’ Memorial Endowment Fund.

Sec. 37.14.700.
Alaska veterans’ memorial endowment fund established.

The Alaska veterans’ memorial endowment fund is established as a separate endowment trust fund of the state. The fund consists of

appropriations to the fund;

donations to the fund; and

income earned on investments of fund assets.

The commissioner of revenue shall manage the fund as an endowment, with the goal that the purchasing power of the fund will not diminish over time without regard to additional contributions that may be made to the fund. The commissioner shall invest the assets of the fund in a manner likely to yield at least a five percent real rate of return over time.

Nothing in this section creates a dedicated fund.

History.

(§ 6 ch 46 SLA 2002)

Sec. 37.14.720.
Powers and duties of the commissioner of revenue.

In carrying out the investment duties under AS

37.14.700

—

37.14.740

, the commissioner of revenue has the powers and duties set out in AS

37.10.071

. The commissioner shall provide reports to the adjutant general of the Department of Military and Veterans’ Affairs on the condition and investment performance of the fund.

History.

(§ 6 ch 46 SLA 2002)

Sec. 37.14.730.
Use of fund.

As soon as practicable after July 1 of each year, the commissioner of revenue shall determine the average month-end market value of the fund for the immediately preceding three fiscal years. The commissioner shall identify five percent of that amount as available for appropriation by the legislature for uses described in (b) of this section.

Appropriations of the amount identified in (a) of this section may be used for the following purposes:

grants for the maintenance, repair, replacement, and enhancement of, or addition to, veterans’ memorials or monuments to the military;

grants for the development and construction of new veterans’ memorials or monuments to the military if the adjutant general determines that the purposes set out in (1) of this subsection have been met in a fiscal year;

reimbursement of the costs of establishment, management, and administration of the fund.

After consultation with appropriate veterans’ organizations, the adjutant general of the Department of Military and Veterans’ Affairs shall administer the grant program and award grants from the money appropriated from the fund. The adjutant general may adopt regulations under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) to establish procedures and standards to administer the grant program and for the award of grants. The standards may include requirements for recipients to match grant awards, if appropriate.

History.

(§ 6 ch 46 SLA 2002)

Administrative Code. —

For veterans’ memorial and monument grants, see 10 AAC 30.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for
ch. 46, SLA 2002 (HCS CSSB 267(FIN)), see 2002 Senate Journal 2084-2086.

Sec. 37.14.740.
Definition.

In AS

37.14.700

—

37.14.740

, “fund” means the Alaska veterans’ memorial endowment fund established in AS

37.14.700

.

History.

(§ 6 ch 46 SLA 2002)